Idaho, session 2026, S1420.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-3731, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-3731. CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS FOR STATE-SUPPORTED MEDICAL STUDENTS
-- MEDICAL EDUCATION REIMBURSEMENT FUND. (1) An individual who qualifies as
an Idaho resident pursuant to section 33-3717B, Idaho Code, and who is ac-
cepted into a medical education program enrolling Idaho students supported
by Idaho state funds in slots reserved for Idaho students shall, before
confirming enrollment in such program or school, enter into a contract with
the state board of education or the board's designee, which contract shall
specify that the individual will commit to entering active full-time profes-
sional practice in Idaho for a period of four (4) years within one (1) year
of:
(a) Obtaining a license to practice medicine;
(b) Finishing a residency or subspecialty residency; or
(c) Finishing a medical education fellowship as defined by the state
board of education or the board's designee.
(2) Each year of a residency served in Idaho, up to four (4) years, will
be credited as one-half (1/2) year of the practice requirement provided in
subsection (1) of this section. After the fourth year, no credit shall be
given for any additional residency years.
(3) An individual who fails to abide by the contract described in sub-
section (1) of this section shall reimburse the state for the state's finan-
cial obligation in supporting the individual's medical education, as deter-
mined by the state board of education or the board's designee. Reimbursement
must:
(a) Begin within one (1) year of:
(i) Obtaining a license to practice medicine;
(ii) Finishing a residency or subspecialty residency; or
(iii) Finishing a medical education fellowship as defined by the
state board of education or the board's designee;
(b) Be paid according to an amortized schedule established by the state
board of education or the board's designee; and
(c) Be completed within eight (8) years of the date the reimbursement
requirement began.
(4) The reimbursement obligation described in subsection (3) of this
section:
(a) Shall not accrue any interest; and


(b) May, by act of the state board of education or the board's designee,
be:
(i) Suspended if reimbursement is temporarily impossible or
would create extreme hardship for a temporary period, including
but not limited to suspension for medical reasons, personal rea-
sons, parental leave, or call to active duty in the armed forces;
or
(ii) Waived if:
1. Reimbursement is permanently impossible or would create
extreme hardship, including but not limited to death, in-
ability to complete the program, or inability to obtain a li-
cense to practice medicine; or
2. The individual owing reimbursement is participating in
a program of the federal government or United States armed
forces that has a service requirement.
(5) The provisions of this section shall apply to individuals matric-
ulating in a medical education program enrolling Idaho students supported
by Idaho state funds in slots reserved for Idaho students in fall 2023 and
thereafter.
(6) There is hereby established in the state treasury a medical educa-
tion reimbursement fund, which shall be administered by the state board of
education or the board's designee. Moneys in the fund shall:
(a) Consist of:
(i) Reimbursement paid pursuant to subsection (3) of this sec-
tion;
(ii) On and after July 1, 2028, one percent (1%) of the gross re-
ceipts by the state of the tax on health insurance premiums, as
provided by section 41-402, Idaho Code, hereby perpetually appro-
priated to the medical education fund;
(ii) (iii) Legislative appropriations;
(iii) (iv) Donations; and
(iv) (v) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund; and
(b) Be used for, subject to availability:
(i) The costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of
this section; and
(ii) Incentive grants in an amount and according to a program
established under state board of education policy. Such grants
shall be awarded to licensed physicians who practice medicine in
Idaho and who meet other criteria provided in board policy.
(7) The state board of education is authorized to take such actions as
are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.